Hawaii statutes.
[§346-146] Penalty. Any person who
uses the transportation assistance under this chapter for any purpose other
than that for which approved by the director shall be guilty of a misdemeanor
and required to return the full amount of the transportation assistance used.
[L 1980, c 276, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next